Utah statutes.
78B-15-705.   Limitation on husband's dispute of paternity.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), the husband of a wife who gives birth to a child by means of assisted reproduction may not challenge his paternity of the child unless:

(a)  within two years after learning of the birth of the child he commences a proceeding to adjudicate his paternity; and

(b)  the tribunal finds that he did not consent to the assisted reproduction, before or after the birth of the child.

(2)  A proceeding to adjudicate paternity may be maintained at any time if the tribunal determines that:

(a)  the husband did not provide sperm for, or before or after the birth of the child consent to, assisted reproduction by his wife;

(b)  the husband and the mother of the child have not cohabited since the probable time of assisted reproduction; and

(c)  the husband never openly treated the child as his own.

(3)  The limitation provided in this section applies to a marriage declared invalid after assisted reproduction.

